Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2100.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Protecting Patients Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Administrative support." Tasks performed to assist a mental health therapist in the delivery of therapy or psychotherapy services that do not involve confidential communications. The term includes:(1) Managing appointment scheduling and reminders.123456789101112131415161718 (2) Processing billing and insurance claims."Artificial intelligence." A machine-based system that makes predictions, recommendations or decisions influencing real or virtual environments."Artificial intelligence technology." A computer system, application or other product that uses or incorporates one or more forms of artificial intelligence."Confidential communications." Information obtained by an individual licensed under the act of March 23, 1972 (P.L.136, No.52), known as the Professional Psychologists Practice Act, including information obtained by the individual's examination of the client or patient, which is:(1) the following:(i) transmitted between the client or patient and an individual in the course of their professional relationship; or(ii) transmitted among the client or patient, an individual and individuals who are participating in the diagnosis or treatment under the direction of an individual, including members of the client's or patient's family; and(2) made in confidence, for the diagnosis or treatment of the client or patient by the individual and by a means not intended to be disclosed to third persons other than those individuals:(i) present to further the interest of the client or patient in the consultation, examination or interview;(ii) reasonably necessary for the transmission of the communications; or(iii) participating in the diagnosis and treatment 20250HB2100PN2700 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the client or patient under the direction of the mental health therapist."Generative artificial intelligence." An artificial intelligence technology that:(1) is trained on data;(2) is designed to simulate human conversation with a consumer through one or more of the following:(i) text;(ii) audio; or(iii) visual communication; and(3) generates nonscripted outputs similar to outputs created by a human with limited or no human oversight."Health care provider." As defined in 45 CFR 160.103 (relating to definitions)."Health plan." As defined in 45 CFR 160.103."Individually identifiable health information." Information, whether oral or recorded in any form or medium, that relates to the physical or mental health or condition of an individual."Mental health chatbot."(1) An artificial intelligence technology that:(i) uses generative artificial intelligence to engage in interactive conversations with a user similar to the confidential communications that an individual would have with a mental health therapist; and(ii) a supplier represents, or a reasonable person would believe, can or will provide mental health therapy or help a user manage or treat mental health conditions.(2) The term does not include artificial intelligence technology that only:(i) provides scripted output, such as guided 20250HB2100PN2700 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 meditations or mindfulness exercises; or(ii) analyzes an individual's input for the purpose of connecting the individual with a mental health therapist."Mental health therapist." An individual who is engaging in the practice of psychology as defined in the Professional Psychologists Practice Act."Pennsylvania user." An individual located in this Commonwealth at the time the individual accesses or uses a mental health chatbot."Supplier." A seller, lessor, assignor, offeror, broker or other person that regularly solicits, engages in or enforces consumer transactions, whether or not the person deals directly with consumers."Therapy." The treatment of mental conditions by verbal or written communication and interaction."User input." Content provided to a mental health chatbot by a Pennsylvania user.Section 3. Protection of personal information.(a) Prohibition.--A supplier of a mental health chatbot may not sell to or share with a third party:(1) individually identifiable health information of a Pennsylvania user; or(2) user input of a Pennsylvania user.(b) Applicability.--Subsection (a) does not apply to individually identifiable health information:(1) requested by a health care provider with the consent of the Pennsylvania user;(2) provided to a health plan of a Pennsylvania user upon request of the Pennsylvania user; or20250HB2100PN2700 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) shared in compliance with subsection (c).(c) Exception.--A supplier of a mental health chatbot may share individually identifiable health information necessary to ensure the effective functionality of the mental health chatbot with another party with which the supplier has a contract related to that functionality. When sharing information under this subsection, the supplier and the other entity shall comply with all applicable privacy and security provisions of 45 CFR Pts. 160 (relating to general administrative requirements) and 164 Subpts. A (relating to general provisions) and E (relating to privacy of individually identifiable health information), as if the supplier were a covered entity and the other entity were a business associate, as those terms are defined in 45 CFR 160.103 (relating to definitions).Section 4. Advertising.(a) Prohibitions.--(1) A supplier of a mental health chatbot may not use a mental health chatbot to advertise a specific product or service to a Pennsylvania user in a conversation between the Pennsylvania user and the mental health chatbot unless the mental health chatbot:(i) Clearly and conspicuously identifies the advertisement as an advertisement.(ii) Clearly and conspicuously discloses to the Pennsylvania user any:(A) sponsorship;(B) business affiliation; or(C) agreement that the supplier has with a third party to promote, advertise or recommend the product or service.20250HB2100PN2700 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A supplier of a mental health chatbot may not use a Pennsylvania user's input to:(i) determine whether to display an advertisement for a product or service to the Pennsylvania user, unless the advertisement is for the mental health chatbot itself;(ii) determine a product, service or category of product or service, to advertise to the Pennsylvania user; or(iii) customize how an advertisement is presented to the Pennsylvania user.(b) Construction.--This section does not prohibit a mental health chatbot from recommending that a Pennsylvania user seek counseling, therapy or other assistance from a mental health therapist, including a specific mental health therapist.Section 5. Disclosures.(a) Artificial intelligence.--A supplier of a mental health chatbot shall cause a mental health chatbot to clearly and conspicuously disclose to a Pennsylvania user that the mental health chatbot is an artificial intelligence technology and not a human.(b) Process.--The disclosure under subsection (a) shall be made:(1) Before the Pennsylvania user may access the features of the mental health chatbot.(2) At the beginning of any interaction with the Pennsylvania user if the Pennsylvania user has not accessed the mental health chatbot within the previous seven days.(3) Any time a Pennsylvania user asks or otherwise prompts the mental health chatbot about whether artificial 20250HB2100PN2700 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 intelligence is being used.Section 6. Prohibition on unauthorized therapy services.(a) Requirements.--An individual, corporation, supplier or entity may not provide, advertise or otherwise offer therapy services, including through the use of Internet-based artificial intelligence, to the public in this Commonwealth unless the therapy or psychotherapy services are conducted by an individual who is a mental health therapist.(b) Use of artificial intelligence.--A mental health therapist may only use artificial intelligence for administrative support. A mental health therapist may not allow artificial intelligence to do any of the following:(1) make independent therapeutic decisions;(2) directly interact with clients in any form of therapeutic communication;(3) generate therapeutic recommendations or treatment plans without review and approval by the mental health therapist; or(4) detect emotions or mental states.Section 7. Disclosure of records and communications.All records kept by a mental health therapist and all communications between a patient and a mental health therapist shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed except as required under the act of July 9, 1976 (P.L.817, No.143), known as the Mental Health Procedures Act.Section 8. Enforcement and penalties.A violation of this act shall be subject to section 11 of the act of March 23, 1972 (P.L.136, No.52), known as the Professional Psychologists Practice Act.Section 9. Applicability.20250HB2100PN2700 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 This act shall apply to the extent to which the use of artificial intelligence is not preempted by Federal law.Section 10. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2100PN2700 - 8 - 1234